Connecticut, session 2026, SB00422.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Subdivision (20) of subsection (a) of section 16-1 of the 2026
supplement to the general statutes is repealed and the following is
substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(20) "Class I renewable energy source" means (A) electricity derived
from (i) solar power, (ii) wind power, (iii) a fuel cell, (iv) geothermal, (v)
anaerobic digestion or other biogas derived from biological sources, (vi)
thermal electric direct energy conversion from a certified Class I
renewable energy source, (vii) ocean thermal power, (viii) wave or tidal
power, (ix) low emission advanced renewable energy conversion
technologies, including, but not limited to, zero emission low grade heat
power generation systems based on organic oil free rankine, kalina or
other similar nonsteam cycles that use waste heat from an industrial or
commercial process that does not generate electricity, (x) (I) a run-of-
the-river hydropower facility that began operation after July 1, 2003, has
a generating capacity of not more than sixty megawatts, is not based on
SB422 / File No. 472 1

SB422 File No. 472
a new dam or a dam identified by the Commissioner of Energy and
Environmental Protection as a candidate for removal, and meets
applicable state and federal requirements, including state dam safety
requirements and applicable site-specific standards for water quality
and fish passage, or (II) a run-of-the-river hydropower facility that
received a new license after January 1, 2018, under the Federal Energy
Regulatory Commission rules pursuant to 18 CFR 16, as amended from
time to time, is not based on a new dam or a dam identified by the
Commissioner of Energy and Environmental Protection as a candidate
for removal, and meets applicable state and federal requirements,
including state dam safety requirements and applicable site-specific
standards for water quality and fish passage, [(xi) a biomass facility,
provided such facility has executed an agreement to provide energy to
an electric distribution company prior to October 1, 2025, that (I) uses
sustainable biomass fuel and has an average emission rate of equal to or
less than .075 pounds of nitrogen oxides per million BTU of heat input
for the previous calendar quarter, or (II) has a capacity of less than five
hundred kilowatts that began construction before July 1, 2003, may be
considered a Class I renewable energy source for the duration of such
agreement,] or [(xii)] (xi) a nuclear power generating facility constructed
on or after October 1, 2023, or (B) any electrical generation, including
distributed generation, generated from a Class I renewable energy
source, provided, on and after January 1, 2014, any megawatt hours of
electricity from a renewable energy source described under this
subparagraph that are claimed or counted by a load-serving entity,
province or state toward compliance with renewable portfolio
standards or renewable energy policy goals in another province or state,
other than the state of Connecticut, shall not be eligible for compliance
with the renewable portfolio standards established pursuant to section
16-245a;
Sec. 2. Subsections (a) and (b) of section 16a-3u of the 2026
supplement to the general statutes are repealed and the following is
substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(a) For the purposes of this section:
SB422 / File No. 472 2

SB422 File No. 472
(1) "Existing biomass power purchase agreement" means a power
purchase agreement that: (A) (i) Was entered into by a biomass facility
that uses sustainable biomass fuel and has an average emission rate of
less than or equal to .075 pounds of nitrogen oxides per million BTU of
heat input for the previous calendar quarter, or energy derived from a
biomass facility with a capacity of less than five hundred kilowatts that
began construction before July 1, 2003, with an electric distribution
company in the state on or before June 5, 2013, or (ii) was executed in
accordance with a solicitation pursuant to section 16a-3f or 16a-3h; and
(B) was in effect as of January 1, 2024.
(2) "Eligible biomass facility" means a biomass facility that uses
sustainable biomass fuel and has an average emission rate of less than
or equal to .075 pounds of nitrogen oxides per million BTU of heat input
for the previous calendar quarter, or energy derived from a biomass
facility with a capacity of less than five hundred kilowatts that began
construction before July 1, 2003, and that has entered into one or more
existing biomass power purchase agreements.
(3) "Additional biomass power purchase agreement" means a
biomass power purchase agreement that is entered into by an eligible
biomass facility and an electric distribution company pursuant to
subdivision (b) of this section, for such facility's energy. [, capacity and
environmental attributes, or any combination of such energy and
attributes.]
(4) "Electric distribution company" and "electric supplier" have the
same meanings as provided in section 16-1, as amended by this act.
(b) Not later than September 1, 2025, the Commissioner of Energy and
Environmental Protection shall initiate a proceeding to solicit proposals,
in consultation with the procurement manager identified in subsection
(l) of section 16-2, and the Office of Consumer Counsel, in one
solicitation or multiple solicitations, for energy [and environmental
attributes] from eligible biomass facilities. The Commissioner of Energy
and Environmental Protection may direct any electric distribution
company to enter into one or more additional biomass power purchase
SB422 / File No. 472 3

SB422 File No. 472
agreements with any eligible biomass facility, provided any such
agreement considers the costs to operate such facility, is in the best
interest of ratepayers and supports the state's solid waste management
plan pursuant to section 22a-228. Any such additional power purchase
agreement shall begin upon the termination of the applicable existing
biomass power purchase agreements, and shall not exceed a period of
ten years.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 16-1(a)(20)
Sec. 2 October 1, 2026 16a-3u(a) and (b)
ET Joint Favorable
SB422 / File No. 472 4

SB422 File No. 472
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
The bill removes an exemption in PA 25-173 for biomass facilities
with an executed agreement to provide energy to an electric distribution
company before October 1, 2025, and has no fiscal impact to the state.
The Out Years
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
SB422 / File No. 472 5

SB422 File No. 472
OLR Bill Analysis
SB 422
AN ACT CONCERNING BIOMASS FACILITIES.